third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/tg_TG.aff
FLAG num
SFX 753 N 5
SFX 753 0 таринҳо .
SFX 753 0 таринҳоро .
SFX 753 0 таринҳост .
SFX 753 0 таринҳоянд .
SFX 753 0 таринҳояшро .

SFX 754 N 1
SFX 754 0 таринӣ .

SFX 755 N 3
SFX 755 0 тарине .
SFX 755 0 таринеро .
SFX 755 0 таринест .

SFX 756 N 3
SFX 756 0 тарон .
SFX 756 0 таронро .
SFX 756 0 тарону .

SFX 757 N 17
SFX 757 0 то .
SFX 757 0 тоанд .
SFX 757 0 тоаш .
SFX 757 0 тоашон .
SFX 757 0 тоашро .
SFX 757 0 тову .
SFX 757 0 тои .
SFX 757 0 торо .
SFX 757 0 тост .
SFX 757 0 тою .
SFX 757 0 тоям .
SFX 757 0 тоянд .
SFX 757 0 тоятон .
SFX 757 0 тояш .
SFX 757 0 тояшон .
SFX 757 0 тояшонро .
SFX 757 0 тояшро .

SFX 758 N 4
SFX 758 0 тоӣ .
SFX 758 0 тоиву .
SFX 758 0 тоии .
SFX 758 0 тоию .

SFX 759 N 5
SFX 759 0 тоб .
SFX 759 0 тобаш .
SFX 759 0 тоби .
SFX 759 0 тобро .
SFX 759 0 тобу .

SFX 760 N 2
SFX 760 0 тобӣ .
SFX 760 0 тобии .

SFX 761 N 1
SFX 761 0 тобест .

SFX 762 N 1
SFX 762 0 тобон .

SFX 763 N 1
SFX 763 0 тогӣ .

SFX 764 N 1
SFX 764 0 тое .

SFX 765 N 1
SFX 765 0 тоякак .

SFX 766 N 12
SFX 766 0 ум .
SFX 766 0 умам .
SFX 766 0 умамон .
SFX 766 0 умамро .
SFX 766 0 уманд .
SFX 766 0 умат .
SFX 766 0 умаш .
SFX 766 0 умашон .
SFX 766 0 умашро .
SFX 766 0 уми .
SFX 766 0 умро .
SFX 766 0 уму .

SFX 767 N 6
SFX 767 0 умӣ .
SFX 767 0 умиам .
SFX 767 0 умиаш .
SFX 767 0 умии .
SFX 767 0 умиро .
SFX 767 0 умист .

SFX 768 N 1
SFX 768 0 уме .

SFX 769 N 5
SFX 769 0 умин .
SFX 769 0 уминашон .
SFX 769 0 уминашонро .
SFX 769 0 умини .
SFX 769 0 уминро .

SFX 770 N 3
SFX 770 0 ур .
SFX 770 0 ури .
SFX 770 0 урро .

SFX 771 N 2
SFX 771 0 урӣ .
SFX 771 0 урии .

SFX 772 N 1
SFX 772 0 уре .

SFX 773 N 1
SFX 773 0 урон .

SFX 774 N 1
SFX 774 0 уроне .

SFX 775 N 4
SFX 775 0 фом .
SFX 775 0 фомаш .
SFX 775 0 фомро .
SFX 775 0 фому .

SFX 776 N 1
SFX 776 0 фоме .

SFX 777 N 7
SFX 777 0 хон .
SFX 777 0 хонам .
SFX 777 0 хонат .
SFX 777 0 хонаш .
SFX 777 0 хони .
SFX 777 0 хонро .
SFX 777 0 хону .

SFX 778 N 1
SFX 778 0 хонӣ .

SFX 779 N 1
SFX 779 0 хонакам .

SFX 780 N 1
SFX 780 0 хониён .

SFX 781 N 1
SFX 781 0 хонов .

SFX 782 N 1
SFX 782 0 хоновҳо .

SFX 783 N 1
SFX 783 0 хонова .

SFX 784 N 1
SFX 784 0 хонович .

SFX 785 N 1
SFX 785 0 хоновна .

SFX 786 N 8
SFX 786 0 чӣ .
SFX 786 0 чиаш .
SFX 786 0 чиашро .
SFX 786 0 чиву .
SFX 786 0 чии .
SFX 786 0 чиро .
SFX 786 0 чию .
SFX 786 0 чияш .

SFX 787 N 18
SFX 787 0 ча .
SFX 787 0 чаам .
SFX 787 0 чаамон .
SFX 787 0 чаамонро .
SFX 787 0 чаамро .
SFX 787 0 чаат .
SFX 787 0 чаатон .
SFX 787 0 чаатонро .
SFX 787 0 чаатро .
SFX 787 0 чааш .
SFX 787 0 чаашон .
SFX 787 0 чаашонро .
SFX 787 0 чаашро .
SFX 787 0 чаву .
SFX 787 0 чаи .
SFX 787 0 чаро .
SFX 787 0 чаю .
SFX 787 0 чаям .

SFX 788 N 1
SFX 788 0 чаҳаки .

SFX 789 N 14
SFX 789 0 чаҳо .
SFX 789 0 чаҳову .
SFX 789 0 чаҳои .
SFX 789 0 чаҳоро .
SFX 789 0 чаҳост .
SFX 789 0 чаҳою .
SFX 789 0 чаҳоям .
SFX 789 0 чаҳоямон .
SFX 789 0 чаҳоямонро .
SFX 789 0 чаҳоят .
SFX 789 0 чаҳоятонро .
SFX 789 0 чаҳояш .
SFX 789 0 чаҳояшон .
SFX 789 0 чаҳояшро .

SFX 790 N 2
SFX 790 0 чаҳое .
SFX 790 0 чаҳоеро .

SFX 791 N 1
SFX 791 0 чавӣ .

SFX 792 N 1
SFX 792 0 чавор .

SFX 793 N 2
SFX 793 0 чагӣ .
SFX 793 0 чагии .

SFX 794 N 1
SFX 794 0 чагарон .

SFX 795 N 2
SFX 795 0 чагон .
SFX 795 0 чагонро .

SFX 796 N 3
SFX 796 0 чае .
SFX 796 0 чаеро .
SFX 796 0 чаест .

SFX 797 N 1
SFX 797 0 чаев .

SFX 798 N 4
SFX 798 0 чак .
SFX 798 0 чаканд .
SFX 798 0 чаки .
SFX 798 0 чаку .

SFX 799 N 1
SFX 799 0 чакҳоро .

SFX 800 N 1
SFX 800 0 чакӣ .

SFX 801 N 1
SFX 801 0 чактарини .

SFX 802 N 3
SFX 802 0 чамонанд .
SFX 802 0 чамонанди .
SFX 802 0 чамонандро .

SFX 803 N 1
SFX 803 0 чамонанде .

SFX 804 N 1
SFX 804 0 чамонанди .

SFX 805 N 1
SFX 805 0 чанок .

SFX 806 N 3
SFX 806 0 чатоб .
SFX 806 0 чатоби .
SFX 806 0 чатобро .

SFX 807 N 1
SFX 807 0 чатобе .

SFX 808 N 2
SFX 808 0 чаякашро .
SFX 808 0 чаяки .

SFX 809 N 1
SFX 809 0 чаяконашонро .

SFX 810 N 4
SFX 810 0 чиҳо .
SFX 810 0 чиҳову .
SFX 810 0 чиҳои .
SFX 810 0 чиҳоро .

SFX 811 N 7
SFX 811 0 чигӣ .
SFX 811 0 чигиаш .
SFX 811 0 чигиашро .
SFX 811 0 чигиву .
SFX 811 0 чигии .
SFX 811 0 чигиро .
SFX 811 0 чигию .

SFX 812 N 1
SFX 812 0 чие .

SFX 813 N 6
SFX 813 0 чиён .
SFX 813 0 чиёнаш .
SFX 813 0 чиёнашон .
SFX 813 0 чиёни .
SFX 813 0 чиёнро .
SFX 813 0 чиёну .

SFX 814 N 1
SFX 814 0 чиёнӣ .

SFX 815 N 1
SFX 815 0 чиёне .

SFX 816 N 1
SFX 816 0 шан .

SFX 817 N 13
SFX 817 0 юм .
SFX 817 0 юмам .
SFX 817 0 юмамон .
SFX 817 0 юмамро .
SFX 817 0 юмат .
SFX 817 0 юматонро .
SFX 817 0 юмаш .
SFX 817 0 юмашон .
SFX 817 0 юмашонро .
SFX 817 0 юмашро .
SFX 817 0 юми .
SFX 817 0 юмро .
SFX 817 0 юму .

SFX 818 N 3
SFX 818 0 юмӣ .
SFX 818 0 юмиву .
SFX 818 0 юмиро .

SFX 819 N 1
SFX 819 0 юме .

SFX 820 N 1
SFX 820 0 юмиҳоро .

SFX 821 N 3
SFX 821 0 юмин .
SFX 821 0 юминашон .
SFX 821 0 юмини .

SFX 822 N 12
SFX 822 0 як .
SFX 822 0 якам .
SFX 822 0 якамон .
SFX 822 0 якамро .
SFX 822 0 яканд .
SFX 822 0 якат .
SFX 822 0 якатро .
SFX 822 0 якаш .
SFX 822 0 якашро .
SFX 822 0 яки .
SFX 822 0 якро .
SFX 822 0 яку .

SFX 823 N 3
SFX 823 0 якҳо .
SFX 823 0 якҳои .
SFX 823 0 якҳоро .

SFX 824 N 4
SFX 824 0 якӣ .
SFX 824 0 якианд .
SFX 824 0 якии .
SFX 824 0 якист .

SFX 825 N 1
SFX 825 0 якак .

SFX 826 N 1
SFX 826 0 яке .

SFX 827 N 3
SFX 827 0 якон .
SFX 827 0 яконашро .
SFX 827 0 якони .

SFX 828 N 1
SFX 828 0 якчаҳои .

SFX 829 N 1
SFX 829 0 яме .

SFX 830 N 1
SFX 830 0 ян .

SFX 831 N 17
SFX 831 0 янда .
SFX 831 0 яндаам .
SFX 831 0 яндаамон .
SFX 831 0 яндаамро .
SFX 831 0 яндаасту .
SFX 831 0 яндаат .
SFX 831 0 яндаатон .
SFX 831 0 яндаатонро .
SFX 831 0 яндаатро .
SFX 831 0 яндааш .
SFX 831 0 яндаашон .
SFX 831 0 яндаашро .
SFX 831 0 яндаву .
SFX 831 0 яндаи .
SFX 831 0 яндаӣ .
SFX 831 0 яндаро .
SFX 831 0 яндаю .

SFX 832 N 3
SFX 832 0 яндаҳо .
SFX 832 0 яндаҳои .
SFX 832 0 яндаҳоро .

SFX 833 N 7
SFX 833 0 яндагӣ .
SFX 833 0 яндагиам .
SFX 833 0 яндагиатон .
SFX 833 0 яндагиаш .
SFX 833 0 яндагии .
SFX 833 0 яндагиро .
SFX 833 0 яндагист .

SFX 834 N 2
SFX 834 0 яндагиҳо .
SFX 834 0 яндагиҳои .

SFX 835 N 8
SFX 835 0 яндагон .
SFX 835 0 яндагон6 .
SFX 835 0 яндагонанд .
SFX 835 0 яндагонаш .
SFX 835 0 яндагонем .
SFX 835 0 яндагони .
SFX 835 0 яндагонро .
SFX 835 0 яндагону .

SFX 836 N 1
SFX 836 0 яндагоне .

SFX 837 N 2
SFX 837 0 яндае .
SFX 837 0 яндаеро .

SFX 838 N 1
SFX 838 0 яндатар .

SFX 839 N 4
SFX 839 0 амат .
SFX 839 0 аматон .
SFX 839 0 амаш .
SFX 839 0 амашон .

SFX 840 N 1
SFX 840 0 амед .

SFX 841 N 1
SFX 841 0 ами .

SFX 842 N 8
SFX 842 0 андам .
SFX 842 0 андамон .
SFX 842 0 андат .
SFX 842 0 андатон .
SFX 842 0 андату .
SFX 842 0 андаш .
SFX 842 0 андашон .
SFX 842 0 андашу .

SFX 843 N 5
SFX 843 0 астам .
SFX 843 0 астаму .
SFX 843 0 астанд .
SFX 843 0 астанду .
SFX 843 0 астем .

SFX 844 N 3
SFX 844 0 едам .
SFX 844 0 едаш .
SFX 844 0 едашон .

SFX 845 N 4
SFX 845 0 емат .
SFX 845 0 емаш .
SFX 845 0 емашон .
SFX 845 0 емашу .

SFX 846 N 2
SFX 846 0 ст .
SFX 846 0 сту .

SFX 848 N 2
SFX 848 0 ямат .
SFX 848 0 ямаш .

SFX 849 N 4
SFX 849 0 яндам .
SFX 849 0 яндат .
SFX 849 0 яндаш .
SFX 849 0 яндашон .

SFX 850 N 1
SFX 850 0 янди .

SFX 851 N 2
SFX 851 0 яст .
SFX 851 0 ясту .

SFX 852 N 1
SFX 852 0 ӣ .

SFX 853 N 33
SFX 853 0 иамон .
SFX 853 0 иамонро .
SFX 853 0 иамро .
SFX 853 0 ианд .
SFX 853 0 ианду .
SFX 853 0 иаст .
SFX 853 0 иат .
SFX 853 0 иатон .
SFX 853 0 иатонро .
SFX 853 0 иатро .
SFX 853 0 иашонро .
SFX 853 0 иашро .
SFX 853 0 иву .
SFX 853 0 ием .
SFX 853 0 иему .
SFX 853 0 иро .
SFX 853 0 ирову .
SFX 853 0 ирост .
SFX 853 0 ист .
SFX 853 0 истам .
SFX 853 0 истанд .
SFX 853 0 исту .
SFX 853 0 иямон .
SFX 853 0 иямонро .
SFX 853 0 иямро .
SFX 853 0 иянд .
SFX 853 0 иятон .
SFX 853 0 иятонро .
SFX 853 0 иятро .
SFX 853 0 ияшро .
SFX 853 0 ияшон .
SFX 853 0 ияшонро .
SFX 853 0 ияшро .

SFX 855 N 1
SFX 855 0 ии .

SFX 856 N 2
SFX 856 0 ият .
SFX 856 0 ияту .

SFX 857 N 1
SFX 857 0 амро .

SFX 858 N 2
SFX 858 0 аст .
SFX 858 0 асту .

SFX 859 N 1
SFX 859 0 и .
