third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/tg_TG.dic
ҳаво/25,852,9,29,11,859,344,853,855,552,555,556,559,14,846,777,16,824,18,21,23,24
ҷӯ/852,29,309,10,11,30,859,474,862,14,846,787,16,17,822,823,826,18,829,20,831,833,834,835,23
ҷидди/9,223,29,319,859,14,846,742,751,752,755,16,21
афзо/852,11,326,382,474,516,17,18,20,831,838
барра/25,7,9,223,29,859,14,787,789,808,16,827
беҳ/7,862,14,742,744,751,752,753,754,755,15
бевиҷдон/852,855,627,768
биҷӯ/852,10,11,853,16,17,18,829,20
бипараст/2,4,10,844,11,31
бист/64,5,261,28,859,14,765,15,766,769
боғ/25,852,75,2,3,5,7,8,140,141,142,144,145,29,337,338,342,859,855,453,454,456,457,699,702,14,15,787,789,796,805
гил/25,852,2,4,5,7,8,229,248,29,11,859,402,855,421,569,14,760,15
гирён/852,2,104,8,7,11,29,859,382,14,15,798,799,800,801
дӯстрӯ/852,29,846,16,822,826,827,18,20
додо/33,313,859,853,777,781,782,783,784,785,18,21,23
ёрдам/859,15,786,810,812,813
зард/25,852,64,80,2,5,7,291,294,29,859,853,855,426,862,580,31,14,742,759,15,775,787,806
зебо/25,33,852,9,223,244,29,10,30,859,344,862,853,855,863,14,846,742,751,752,753,754,777,16,822,18,19,861,20,21,22,23,24
иштирок/7,8,29,859,699,14,15,786,810,813,814,815
кӯрпа/25,857,5,195,9,29,859,14,787,789,790,792,796,16
калон/25,33,852,64,70,2,4,7,212,231,29,859,862,853,360,855,863,856,584,586,31,14,742,751,752,753,15
мӯ/25,852,195,9,223,29,30,859,426,427,428,14,846,16,822,823,828,18,861,21,22,23,24
мӯр/25,64,65,75,2,4,7,29,859,31,14,722,15,787,789,790,795,796
ман/852,64,70,2,92,4,858,843,5,7,29,10,859,853,862,580,14,15
меафшон/1,2,4,11,845
медор/852,1,2,839,4,842,10,11,862,31,649,15
мех/25,852,64,7,29,859,855,552,14,15,787,789,794,796,802
музд/25,7,8,29,859,569,571,572,15,770,771,772,773,774
набера/25,2,3,857,5,6,7,8,9,28,29,859,14,787,788,16,822,23
навад/859,15,766,769
нагӯ/852,10,11,862,17,18,848,20
назора/223,229,247,254,859,760
накӯ/852,9,29,30,859,344,853,855,856,14,846,742,752,16,18,20,21,23,24
ним/7,8,223,29,859,757,758,759,763,15,787,793
ноӯҳдабаро/852,9,10,30,319,859,855,14,846,756,23
носер/852,2,89,840,841,859,627
нуқра/147,195,9,223,229,248,291,29,859,552,696,14,722,759,775,16
нуздаҳ/262,859,766,769
о/9,10,11,12,17,18,20,831,832,835,837
овард/852,35,36,39,45,43,49,64,2,839,91,94,97,4,858,5,7,224,254,258,10,11,12,859,853,862,15
ору/25,9,859,14,822
офият/254,859,540,14,15,777
панҷ/852,64,4,7,8,254,262,859,580,14,757,758,763,15,766,769
паноҳҷӯ/831
пасо/831,835,849
пошш/779
сад/25,8,294,859,344,853,14,757,763,765,15,766,769
салла/7,9,859,569,14,787
саноат/33,852,163,170,29,859,853,855,862,14,15,786,813
саро/25,852,9,29,10,11,30,859,366,368,369,382,853,474,14,846,787,16,17,18,848,20,831,832,833,835,837,21,23
сони/9,859,14,846,742,830,21,24
сурх/25,852,64,65,80,82,2,3,5,6,7,8,291,29,11,859,344,402,409,855,426,853,862,31,627,14,742,759,15,775,787,796,806,807
тӯй/25,8,29,859,627,14,15,777,781,786,787,24
ташаббускор/25,852,29,859,344,862,853,855,31,627,14,15
ташкилот/25,852,3,8,29,859,402,855,14,15,786,811,813
тезгӯ/852,853,822,823
телефон/25,852,2,857,94,5,7,8,859,853,855,862,14,15,786,787
тоҷиддин/859,584,585,14,15,778
тоту/859,826
тугма/25,7,29,859,14,787,789,791,796,16
тугун/787,796,798
устухон/25,64,2,857,5,7,8,29,859,402,855,552,554,14,15,796
фурӯ/254,859,742,752,756
фурӯш/852,1,2,4,104,105,109,112,115,842,7,8,254,255,274,286,10,11,859,344,862,402,855,853,651,655,14,15
хӯ/9,229,29,859,14,846,16,851,21,23,24
хо/10,30,859,366,368,369,382,383,384,474,17,20,831,832,835
хода/223,29,859,14,787,789,796
хушдор/7,29,859,855,14
хушо/20,831,833,849,850
хушрӯ/852,9,223,29,30,859,855,14,846,742,16,822,825,18,21
чанд/2,4,5,262,294,29,859,855,421,436,440,580,31,14,757,758,763,15,766,769,767
чиҳил/859,15,766,769
чила/25,6,859
чингиз/25,5,859,344,853,409,855,15,777,780
чор/852,64,5,7,8,254,28,262,29,859,855,14,757,758,763,15,766,767,769
чордаҳ/14,757,766,769
чуқур/852,29,859,344,345,862,402,855,14,742,752,15,787,789,790,796
шӯъла/25,5,7,147,163,165,166,195,197,9,29,859,552,569,14,796,822
шаш/2,254,262,859,14,757,758,763,15,766,767,769
шунаво/852,9,862,853,855,846,752,16
як/852,2,3,4,6,7,8,294,29,859,14,757,758,763,764,15,766,767,768,769
якчанд/2,29,757,763
